Colorado, session 2026A, HB1170.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Appropriation to the department of transportation
for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025. In Session Laws of Colorado
2025, section 2 of chapter 476, (SB 25-206), amend Part XXII as follows:
Section 2. Appropriation.
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
PART XXII
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
(1) ADMINISTRATION 53,047,230 52,977,230a 70,000b
50,412,009 50,342,009a
(162.5 FTE)
a This amount shall be from the State Highway Fund created in Section 43-1-219, C.R.S., from revenues credited pursuant to Section 43-4-205 (5)(a), C.R.S.
b This amount shall be funded internally by various cash fund sources appropriated in the Construction, Maintenance, and Operations section.
(2) CONSTRUCTION,
MAINTENANCE, AND
OPERATIONS 1,649,205,773 843,911,911(I)a 1,111,756(I)b 804,182,106(I)
1,651,840,994 846,547,132(I)a
(3,156.0 FTE)
a Of this amount, an estimated $779,418,925 $782,054,146 shall be from the State Highway Fund created in Section 43-1-219, C.R.S., and $64,492,986 shall be from various department
sources including: the Aviation Fund created in Section 43-10-109 (1), C.R.S., the State Transit and Rail Fund created in Section 43-4-811 (2), C.R.S., the Law Enforcement Assistance
Fund created in Section 43-4-401, C.R.S., and interest earnings from the loans and balances of the Transportation Infrastructure Revolving Fund created in Section 43-1-113.5 (1), C.R.S.
b This amount shall be funded from various sources of reappropriated funds.
(3) STATEWIDE BRIDGE
AND TUNNEL
ENTERPRISE 181,374,655 166,374,655(I)a 15,000,000(I)
(1.0 FTE)
a This amount shall be from the Statewide Bridge and Tunnel Enterprise Special Revenue Fund created in Section 43-4-805 (3)(a), C.R.S. These funds are subject to allocation by the
Statewide Bridge Enterprise Board pursuant to Section 43-4-805 (3)(b), C.R.S., and are included for informational purposes only.
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1170

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
(4) HIGH
PERFORMANCE
TRANSPORTATION
ENTERPRISE 235,687,122 231,687,122(I)a 4,000,000(I)b
(9.0 FTE)
a This amount shall be from the Statewide Transportation Enterprise Special Revenue Fund created in Section 43-4-806 (3)(a), C.R.S. These funds are subject to allocation by the
High-Performance Transportation Enterprise Board pursuant to Section 43-4-806 (3), C.R.S., and are included for informational purposes only.
b This amount shall be from fees paid from the Construction, Maintenance, and Operations line item to the Statewide Transportation Enterprise Operating Fund created in Section 43-4-806
(4), C.R.S.
(5) SPECIAL PURPOSE
Marijuana Impaired Driving
Program 450,000 450,000a
Multimodal Transportation
Projects103 20,612,617 20,612,617b
21,062,617
a This amount shall be from the Marijuana Tax Cash Fund created in Section 39-28.8-501 (1), C.R.S.
b This amount shall be from the Multimodal Transportation and Mitigation Options Fund created in Section 43-4-1103 (1)(a), C.R.S.
(6) NONATTAINMENT
AREA AIR POLLUTION
MITIGATION
ENTERPRISE 13,377,602 13,377,602(I)a
a This amount shall be from the Nonattainment Area Air Pollution Mitigation Enterprise Fund created in Section 43-4-1303 (5)(a), C.R.S. These funds are subject to allocation by the
Nonattainment Area Air Pollution Mitigation Enterprise Board pursuant to Section 43-4-1303, C.R.S., and are included for informational purposes only.
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1170

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
(7) CLEAN TRANSIT ENTERPRISE
Clean Transit Enterprise
Cash Fund104 49,089,048 49,089,048a
Local Transit and Rail Grant
Programs 55,551,966 55,551,966(I)b
104,641,014
a This amount shall be from the Clean Transit Enterprise Fund created in Section 43-4-1203 (5)(a), C.R.S.
b Of this amount, $38,886,376 shall be from the Local Transit Operations Cash Fund created in Section 43-4-1204 (3)(a), C.R.S., $11,110,393 shall be from the Rail Funding Program
Cash Fund created in Section 43-4-1204 (5)(a), C.R.S., and an estimated $5,555,197 shall be from the Local Transit Grant Program Cash Fund created in Section 43-1204 (4)(a), C.R.S.
These funds are subject to allocation by the Clean Transit Enterprise Board pursuant to Section 43-4-1203, C.R.S., and are included for informational purposes only.
(8) FUELS IMPACT
ENTERPRISE 15,000,000 15,000,000(I)a
a This amount shall be from the Fuels Impact Enterprise created in Section 43-4-1504(b)(I). These funds are subject to allocation by the Transportation Commission pursuant to Section
43-4-1503, C.R.S., and are included for informational purposes only.
TOTALS PART XXII
(TRANSPORTATION) $2,273,396,013 $1,449,032,151a $5,181,756b $819,182,106c
a Of this amount, $1,325,903,256 $1,328,538,477 contains an (I) notation.
b Of this amount, $5,111,756 contains an (I) notation.
c This amount contains an (I) notation.
FOOTNOTES -- The following statements are referenced to the numbered footnotes throughout section 2.
103 Department of Transportation, Special Purpose, Multimodal Transportation Projects - This appropriation remains available for expenditure until the close of
the 2028-29 state fiscal year.
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1170

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
104 Department of Transportation, Clean Transit Enterprise, Clean Transit Enterprise Cash Fund - This appropriation remains available for expenditure until the
close of the 2028-29 state fiscal year.
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1170

SECTION 2. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 6-HOUSE BILL 26-1170